New Jersey, session 221, S3462.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2021, c.199 (C.30:4-8.16) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  As used in this act: "Immigration detention agreement" means any contract, agreement, intergovernmental service agreement, or memorandum of understanding that authorizes the State, local government agency, or private detention facility to house or detain individuals for civil immigration violations. "Local government agency" means a county, county sheriff, municipality, or other political subdivision and any agency, officer, employee, or agent thereof. "Private detention facility" means any privately owned or operated facility that houses or detains individuals for civil immigration violations. b.    On or after the effective date of [this act] P.L. , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): (1)   the State or a local government agency [shall not] may enter into, renew, or extend [any] an immigration detention agreement as defined in subsection a. of this section; [or ] and (2)   a private detention facility operating in this State [shall not] may enter into, renew, or extend [any] an immigration detention agreement as defined in subsection a. of this section. c.     [Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or in any way restrict, any action where the prohibition or restriction would be contrary to federal law, the United States Constitution, or the New Jersey Constitution.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf:  P.L.2021, c.199, s.2) 2.    Section 1 of P.L.2021, c.199 (C.30:4-8.15) is repealed. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.